Arkansas, session 2025, HB1749.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 28 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:

CHAPTER 78
UNIFORM TRUST DECANTING ACT

28-78-101. Short title.
This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Trust Decanting Act.

28-78-102. Definitions.
In this chapter:
(1) “Appointive property” means the property or property
interest subject to a power of appointment;
(2) “Ascertainable standard” means a standard relating to an
individual’s health, education, support, or maintenance within the meaning of
26 U.S.C. Section 2041(b)(1)(A), as it existed on January 1, 2025, or 26
U.S.C. Section 2514(c)(1), as it existed on January, 1, 2025, and any
applicable regulations;
*MAG009*
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
(3) “Authorized fiduciary” means:
(A) A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor,
that has discretion to distribute or direct a trustee to distribute part or
all of the principal of the first trust to one or more current beneficiaries;
(B) A special fiduciary appointed under § 28-78-109; or
(C) A special-needs fiduciary under § 28-78-113;
(4) “Beneficiary” means a person that:
(A) Has a present or future, vested or contingent,
beneficial interest in a trust;
(B) Holds a power of appointment over trust property; or
(C) Is an identified charitable organization that will or
may receive distributions under the terms of the trust;
(5) “Charitable interest” means an interest in a trust which:
(A) Is held by an identified charitable organization and
makes the organization a qualified beneficiary;
(B) Benefits only charitable organizations and, if the
interest were held by an identified charitable organization, would make the
organization a qualified beneficiary; or
(C) Is held solely for charitable purposes and, if the
interest were held by an identified charitable organization, would make the
organization a qualified beneficiary;
(6) “Charitable organization” means:
(A) A person, other than an individual, organized and
operated exclusively for charitable purposes; or
(B) A government or governmental subdivision, agency, or
instrumentality, to the extent it holds funds exclusively for a charitable
purpose;
(7) “Charitable purpose” means the relief of poverty, the
advancement of education or religion, the promotion of health, a municipal or
other governmental purpose, or another purpose the achievement of which is
beneficial to the community;
(8) “Court” means the court in this state having jurisdiction in
matters relating to trusts;
(9)(A) “Current beneficiary” means a beneficiary that on the
date the beneficiary’s qualification is determined is a distributee or
permissible distributee of trust income or principal.
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
(B) "Current beneficiary" includes the holder of a
presently exercisable general power of appointment but does not include a
person that is a beneficiary only because the person holds any other power of
appointment;
(10) “Decanting power” or “the decanting power” means the power
of an authorized fiduciary under this chapter to distribute property of a
first trust to one or more second trusts or to modify the terms of the first
trust;
(11) “Expanded distributive discretion” means a discretionary
power of distribution that is not limited to an ascertainable standard or a
reasonably definite standard;
(12) “First trust” means a trust over which an authorized
fiduciary may exercise the decanting power;
(13) “First-trust instrument” means the trust instrument for a
first trust;
(14) “General power of appointment” means a power of appointment
exercisable in favor of a powerholder, the powerholder’s estate, a creditor
of the powerholder, or a creditor of the powerholder’s estate;
(15) “Jurisdiction”, with respect to a geographic area, includes
a state or country;
(16) “Person” means an individual, estate, business or nonprofit
entity, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency,
or instrumentality, or other legal entity;
(17)(A) “Power of appointment” means a power that enables a
powerholder acting in a nonfiduciary capacity to designate a recipient of an
ownership interest in or another power of appointment over the appointive
property.
(B) "Power of appointment" does not include a power of
attorney;
(18) “Powerholder” means a person in which a donor creates a
power of appointment;
(19)(A) “Presently exercisable power of appointment” means a
power of appointment exercisable by the powerholder at the relevant time.
(B) "Presently exercisable power of appointment":
(1) Includes a power of appointment exercisable only
after the occurrence of a specified event, the satisfaction of an
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
ascertainable standard, or the passage of a specified time only after the:
(i) Occurrence of the specified event;
(ii) Satisfaction of the ascertainable
standard; or
(iii) Passage of the specified time; and
(2) Does not include a power exercisable only at the
powerholder’s death;
(20) “Qualified beneficiary” means a beneficiary that on the
date the beneficiary’s qualification is determined:
(A) Is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust
income or principal;
(B) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of
trust income or principal if the interests of the distributees described in
subdivision (20)(A) of this section terminated on that date without causing
the trust to terminate; or
(C) Would be a distributee or permissible distributee of
trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date;
(21) “Reasonably definite standard” means a clearly measurable
standard under which a holder of a power of distribution is legally
accountable within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. Section 674(b)(5)(A), as is
existed on January 1, 2025, and any applicable regulations;
(22) “Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible
medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable
in perceivable form;
(23) “Second trust” means a:
(A) First trust after modification under this chapter; or
(B) Trust to which a distribution of property from a first
trust is or may be made under this chapter;
(24) “Second-trust instrument” means the trust instrument for a
second trust;
(25)(A) “Settlor”, except as otherwise provided in § 28-78-125,
means a person, including a testator, that creates or contributes property to
a trust.
(B) If more than one person creates or contributes
property to a trust, each person is a settlor of the portion of the trust
property attributable to the person’s contribution except to the extent
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
another person has power to revoke or withdraw that portion;
(26) “Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt
a record to:
(A) Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(B) Attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process;
(27) “State” means a state of the United States, the District of
Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or
insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;
(28) “Terms of the trust” means:
(A) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (28)(B) of
this section, the manifestation of the settlor’s intent regarding a trust’s
provisions as:
(i) Expressed in the trust instrument; or
(ii) Established by other evidence that would be
admissible in a judicial proceeding; or
(B) The trust’s provisions as established, determined, or
amended by a:
(i) Trustee or other person in accordance with
applicable law;
(ii) Court order; or
(iii) Nonjudicial settlement agreement under § 28-
73-111; and
(29) “Trust instrument” means a record executed by the settlor
to create a trust or by any person to create a second trust which contains
some or all of the terms of the trust, including any amendments.

28-78-103. Scope.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this
section, this chapter applies to an express trust that is irrevocable or
revocable by the settlor only with the consent of the trustee or a person
holding an adverse interest.
(b) This chapter does not apply to a trust held solely for charitable
purposes.
(c) Subject to § 28-78-115, a trust instrument may restrict or
prohibit exercise of the decanting power.
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
(d) This chapter does not limit the power of a trustee, powerholder,
or other person to distribute or appoint property in further trust or to
modify a trust under the trust instrument, law of this state other than this
act, common law, a court order, or a nonjudicial settlement agreement.
(e) This chapter does not affect the ability of a settlor to provide
in a trust instrument for the distribution of the trust property or
appointment in further trust of the trust property or for modification of the
trust instrument.

28-78-104. Fiduciary duty.
(a) In exercising the decanting power, an authorized fiduciary shall
act in accordance with its fiduciary duties, including the duty to chapter in
accordance with the purposes of the first trust.
(b) This chapter does not create or imply a duty to exercise the
decanting power or to inform beneficiaries about the applicability of this
act.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in a first-trust instrument, for
purposes of this chapter and § 28-73-802 and § 28-73-803, the terms of the
first trust are deemed to include the decanting power.

28-78-105. Application - Governing law.
This chapter applies to a trust created before, on, or after the
effective date of this chapter which:
(1) Has its principal place of administration in this state,
including a trust whose principal place of administration has been changed to
this state; or
(2) Provides by its trust instrument that it is governed by the
law of this state or is governed by the law of this state for the purpose of:
(A) Administration, including administration of a trust
whose governing law for purposes of administration has been changed to the
law of this state;
(B) Construction of terms of the trust; or
(C) Determining the meaning or effect of terms of the
trust.

28-78-106. Reasonable reliance.
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
A trustee or other person that reasonably relies on the validity of a
distribution of part or all of the property of a trust to another trust, or a
modification of a trust, under this chapter, law of this state other than
this chapter, or the law of another jurisdiction is not liable to any person
for any action or failure to act as a result of the reliance.

28-78-107. Notice - Exercise of decanting power.
(a) In this section, a notice period begins on the day notice is given
under subsection (c) of this section and ends fifty-nine (59) days after the
day notice is given.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, an authorized
fiduciary may exercise the decanting power without the consent of any person
and without court approval.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f) of this section, an
authorized fiduciary shall give notice in a record of the intended exercise
of the decanting power not later than sixty (60) days before the exercise to:
(1) Each settlor of the first trust, if living or then in
existence;
(2) Each qualified beneficiary of the first trust;
(3) Each holder of a presently exercisable power of appointment
over any part or all of the first trust;
(4) Each person that currently has the right to remove or
replace the authorized fiduciary;
(5) Each other fiduciary of the first trust;
(6) Each fiduciary of the second trust; and
(7) The Attorney General, if § 28-78-114(b) applies.
(d) An authorized fiduciary is not required to give notice under
subsection (c) of this section to a:
(1) Qualified beneficiary who is a minor and has no
representative; or
(2) Person that is not known to the fiduciary or is known to the
fiduciary but cannot be located by the fiduciary after reasonable diligence.
(e) A notice under subsection (c) of this section shall:
(1) Specify the manner in which the authorized fiduciary intends
to exercise the decanting power;
(2) Specify the proposed effective date for exercise of the
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
power;
(3) Include a copy of the first-trust instrument; and
(4) Include a copy of all second-trust instruments.
(f) The decanting power may be exercised before expiration of the
notice period under subsection (a) of this section if all persons entitled to
receive notice waive the period in a signed record.
(g) The receipt of notice, waiver of the notice period, or expiration
of the notice period does not affect the right of a person to file an
application under Arkansas Code § 28-78-109 asserting that:
(1) An attempted exercise of the decanting power is ineffective
because it did not comply with this chapter or was an abuse of discretion or
breach of fiduciary duty; or
(2) § 28-78-122 applies to the exercise of the decanting power.
(h) An exercise of the decanting power is not ineffective because of
the failure to give notice to one or more persons under subsection (c) of
this section if the authorized fiduciary acted with reasonable care to comply
with subsection (c) of this section.

28-78-108. Representation.
(a) Notice to a person with authority to represent and bind another
person under a first-trust instrument or § 28-73-301 et seq., has the same
effect as notice given directly to the person represented.
(b) Consent of or waiver by a person with authority to represent and
bind another person under a first-trust instrument or § 28-73-301 et seq., is
binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to
the representation before the consent or waiver otherwise would become
effective.
(c) A person with authority to represent and bind another person under
a first-trust instrument or § 28-73-301 et seq., may file an application
under § 28-78-109 on behalf of the person represented.
(d) A settlor shall not represent or bind a beneficiary under this
chapter.

28-78-109. Court involvement.
(a) On application of an authorized fiduciary, a person entitled to
notice under § 28-78-107(c), a beneficiary, or with respect to a charitable
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
interest the Attorney General or other person that has standing to enforce
the charitable interest, the court may:
(1) Provide instructions to the authorized fiduciary regarding
whether a proposed exercise of the decanting power is permitted under this
chapter and consistent with the fiduciary duties of the authorized fiduciary;
(2) Appoint a special fiduciary and authorize the special
fiduciary to determine whether the decanting power should be exercised under
this chapter and to exercise the decanting power;
(3) Approve an exercise of the decanting power;
(4) Determine that a proposed or attempted exercise of the
decanting power is ineffective because:
(A) After applying § 28-78-122, the proposed or attempted
exercise does not or did not comply with this chapter; or
(B) The proposed or attempted exercise would be or was an
abuse of the fiduciary’s discretion or a breach of fiduciary duty;
(5) Determine the extent to which Arkansas Code § 28-78-122
applies to a prior exercise of the decanting power;
(6) Provide instructions to the trustee regarding the
application of § 28-78-122 to a prior exercise of the decanting power; or
(7) Order other relief to carry out the purposes of this chapter
(b) On application of an authorized fiduciary, the court may approve:
(1) An increase in the fiduciary’s compensation under § 28-78-
116; or
(2) A modification under § 28-778-118 of a provision granting a
person the right to remove or replace the fiduciary.

28-78-110. Formalities.
(a) An exercise of the decanting power shall be made in a record
signed by an authorized fiduciary.
(b) The signed record shall, directly or by reference to the notice
required by § 28-78-107, identify the first trust and the second trust or
trusts and state the property of the first trust being distributed to each
second trust and the property, if any, that remains in the first trust.

28-78-111. Decanting power under expanded distributive discretion.
(a) In this section:
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
(1)(A) “Noncontingent right” means a right that is not subject
to the exercise of discretion or the occurrence of a specified event that is
not certain to occur.
(B) "Noncontingent right" does not mean a right held by a
beneficiary if a person has discretion to distribute property subject to the
right to a person other than the beneficiary or the beneficiary’s estate;
(2) “Presumptive remainder beneficiary” means a qualified
beneficiary other than a current beneficiary;
(3)(A) “Successor beneficiary” means a beneficiary that is not
a qualified beneficiary on the date the beneficiary’s qualification is
determined.
(B) "Successor beneficiary" does not mean a person that is
a beneficiary only because the person holds a nongeneral power of
appointment; and
(4) “Vested interest” means a:
(A) Right to a mandatory distribution that is a
noncontingent right as of the date of the exercise of the decanting power;
(B) Current and noncontingent right, annually or more
frequently, to a mandatory distribution of income, a specified dollar amount,
or a percentage of value of some or all of the trust property;
(C) Current and noncontingent right, annually or more
frequently, to withdraw income, a specified dollar amount, or a percentage of
value of some or all of the trust property;
(D) Presently exercisable general power of appointment; or
(E) Right to receive an ascertainable part of the trust
property on the trust’s termination which is not subject to the exercise of
discretion or to the occurrence of a specified event that is not certain to
occur.
(b) Subject to subsection (c) of this section and Arkansas Code § 28-
78-114, an authorized fiduciary that has expanded distributive discretion
over the principal of a first trust for the benefit of one or more current
beneficiaries may exercise the decanting power over the principal of the
first trust.
(c) Subject to § 28-78-113, in an exercise of the decanting power
under this section, a second trust shall not:
(1) Include as a current beneficiary a person that is not a
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
current beneficiary of the first trust, except as otherwise provided in
subsection (d) of this section;
(2) Include as a presumptive remainder beneficiary or successor
beneficiary a person that is not a current beneficiary, presumptive remainder
beneficiary, or successor beneficiary of the first trust, except as otherwise
provided in subsection (d) of this section; or
(3) Reduce or eliminate a vested interest.
(d) Subject to subdivision (c)(3) of this section and § 28-78-114, in
an exercise of the decanting power under this section, a second trust may be
a trust created or administered under the law of any jurisdiction and may:
(1) Retain a power of appointment granted in the first trust;
(2) Omit a power of appointment granted in the first trust,
other than a presently exercisable general power of appointment;
(3) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder
is a current beneficiary of the first trust and the authorized fiduciary has
expanded distributive discretion to distribute principal to the beneficiary;
and
(4) Create or modify a power of appointment if the powerholder
is a presumptive remainder beneficiary or successor beneficiary of the first
trust, but the exercise of the power may take effect only after the
powerholder becomes, or would have become if then living, a current
beneficiary.
(e)(1) A power of appointment described in subdivision (d)(1) through
(4) of this section may be general or nongeneral.
(2) The class of permissible appointees in favor of which the
power may be exercised may be broader than or different from the
beneficiaries of the first trust.
(f) If an authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive discretion
over part but not all of the principal of a first trust, the fiduciary may
exercise the decanting power under this section over that part of the
principal over which the authorized fiduciary has expanded distributive
discretion.

28-78-112. Decanting power under limited distributive discretion.
(a) In this section, “limited distributive discretion” means a
discretionary power of distribution that is limited to an ascertainable
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
standard or a reasonably definite standard.
(b) An authorized fiduciary that has limited distributive discretion
over the principal of the first trust for benefit of one or more current
beneficiaries may exercise the decanting power over the principal of the
first trust.
(c)(1) Under this section and subject to § 28-78-114, a second trust
may be created or administered under the law of any jurisdiction.
(2) Under this section, the second trusts, in the aggregate,
shall grant each beneficiary of the first trust beneficial interests which
are substantially similar to the beneficial interests of the beneficiary in
the first trust.
(d)(1) A power to make a distribution under a second trust for the
benefit of a beneficiary who is an individual is substantially similar to a
power under the first trust to make a distribution directly to the
beneficiary.
(2) A distribution is for the benefit of a beneficiary if the:
(A) Distribution is applied for the benefit of the
beneficiary;
(B) Beneficiary is under a legal disability or the trustee
reasonably believes the beneficiary is incapacitated, and the distribution is
made as permitted under the Arkansas Trust Code, § 28-73-101 et seq.; or
(C) Distribution is made as permitted under the terms of
the first-trust instrument and the second-trust instrument for the benefit of
the beneficiary.
(e) If an authorized fiduciary has limited distributive discretion
over part but not all of the principal of a first trust, the fiduciary may
exercise the decanting power under this section over that part of the
principal over which the authorized fiduciary has limited distributive
discretion.

28-78-113. Trust for beneficiary with disability.
(a) In this section:
(1) “Beneficiary with a disability” means a beneficiary of a
first trust who the special-needs fiduciary believes may qualify for
governmental benefits based on disability, whether or not the beneficiary
currently receives those benefits or is an individual who has been
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
adjudicated incompetent;
(2) “Governmental benefits” means financial aid or services from
a state, federal, or other public agency;
(3) “Special-needs fiduciary” means, with respect to a trust
that has a beneficiary with a disability:
(A) A trustee or other fiduciary, other than a settlor,
that has discretion to distribute part or all of the principal of a first
trust to one or more current beneficiaries;
(B) If no trustee or fiduciary has discretion under
subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section, a trustee or other fiduciary, other
than a settlor, that has discretion to distribute part or all of the income
of the first trust to one or more current beneficiaries; or
(C) If no trustee or fiduciary has discretion under
subdivisions (a)(3)(A) and (B) of this section, a trustee or other fiduciary,
other than a settlor, that is required to distribute part or all of the
income or principal of the first trust to one or more current beneficiaries;
and
(4) “Special-needs trust” means a trust the trustee believes
would not be considered a resource for purposes of determining whether a
beneficiary with a disability is eligible for governmental benefits.
(b) A special-needs fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under §
28-78-111 over the principal of a first trust as if the fiduciary had
authority to distribute principal to a beneficiary with a disability subject
to expanded distributive discretion if:
(1) A second trust is a special-needs trust that benefits the
beneficiary with a disability; and
(2) The special-needs fiduciary determines that exercise of the
decanting power will further the purposes of the first trust.
(c) In an exercise of the decanting power under this section, the
following rules apply:
(1) Notwithstanding § 28-78-111(c)(2), the interest in the
second trust of a beneficiary with a disability may:
(A) Be a pooled trust as defined by Medicaid law for the
benefit of the beneficiary with a disability under 42 U.S.C. Section
1396p(d)(4)(C), as it existed on January 1, 2025; or
(B) Contain payback provisions complying with
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
reimbursement requirements of Medicaid law under 42 U.S.C. Section
1396p(d)(4)(A), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) Section 28-78-111(c)(3) does not apply to the interests of
the beneficiary with a disability; and
(3) Except as affected by any change to the interests of the
beneficiary with a disability, the second trust, or if there are two or more
second trusts, the second trusts in the aggregate, shall grant each other
beneficiary of the first trust beneficial interests in the second trusts
which are substantially similar to the beneficiary’s beneficial interests in
the first trust.

28-78-114. Protection of charitable interest.
(a) In this section:
(1) “Determinable charitable interest” means a charitable
interest that is a right to a mandatory distribution currently, periodically,
on the occurrence of a specified event, or after the passage of a specified
time and which is unconditional or will be held solely for charitable
purposes.
(2) “Unconditional” means not subject to the occurrence of a
specified event that is not certain to occur, other than a requirement in a
trust instrument that a charitable organization be in existence or qualify
under a particular provision of the United States Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, on the date of the distribution, if the charitable
organization meets the requirement on the date of determination.
(b) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the
Attorney General has the rights of a qualified beneficiary and may represent
and bind the charitable interest.
(c) If a first trust contains a charitable interest, the second trust
or trusts shall not:
(1) Diminish the charitable interest;
(2) Diminish the interest of an identified charitable
organization that holds the charitable interest;
(3) Alter any charitable purpose stated in the first-trust
instrument; or
(4) Alter any condition or restriction related to the charitable
interest.
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
(d) If there are two (2) or more second trusts, the second trusts
shall be treated as one trust for purposes of determining whether the
exercise of the decanting power diminishes the charitable interest or
diminishes the interest of an identified charitable organization for purposes
of subsection (c) of this section.
(e) If a first trust contains a determinable charitable interest, the
second trust or trusts that include a charitable interest pursuant to
subsection (c) of this section shall be administered under the law of this
state unless the:
(1) Attorney General, after receiving notice under § 28-78-107,
fails to object in a signed record delivered to the authorized fiduciary
within the notice period;
(2) Attorney General consents in a signed record to the second
trust or trusts being administered under the law of another jurisdiction; or
(3) Court approves the exercise of the decanting power.
(f) This chapter does not limit the powers and duties of the Attorney
General under law of this state other than this chapter.

27-78-115. Trust limitation on decanting.
(a) An authorized fiduciary shall not exercise the decanting power to
the extent the first-trust instrument expressly prohibits exercise of:
(1) The decanting power; or
(2) A power granted by state law to the fiduciary to distribute
part or all of the principal of the trust to another trust or to modify the
trust.
(b) Exercise of the decanting power is subject to any restriction in
the first-trust instrument that expressly applies to exercise of:
(1) The decanting power; or
(2) A power granted by state law to a fiduciary to distribute
part or all of the principal of the trust to another trust or to modify the
trust.
(c) A general prohibition of the amendment or revocation of a first
trust, a spendthrift clause, or a clause restraining the voluntary or
involuntary transfer of a beneficiary’s interest does not preclude exercise
of the decanting power.
(d) Subject to subsections (a) and (b) of this section, an authorized
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
fiduciary may exercise the decanting power under this chapter even if the
first-trust instrument permits the authorized fiduciary or another person to
modify the first-trust instrument or to distribute part or all of the
principal of the first trust to another trust.
(e) If a first-trust instrument contains an express prohibition
described in subsection (a) of this section or an express restriction
described in subsection (b) of this section, the provision shall be included
in the second-trust instrument.

28-78-116. Change in compensation.
(a) If a first-trust instrument specifies an authorized fiduciary’s
compensation, the fiduciary shall not exercise the decanting power to
increase the fiduciary’s compensation above the specified compensation
unless:
(1) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to
the increase in a signed record; or
(2) The increase is approved by the court.
(b) If a first-trust instrument does not specify an authorized
fiduciary’s compensation, the fiduciary shall not exercise the decanting
power to increase the fiduciary’s compensation above the compensation
permitted by § 28-73-708 unless:
(1) All qualified beneficiaries of the second trust consent to
the increase in a signed record; or
(2) The increase is approved by the court.
(c) A change in an authorized fiduciary’s compensation which is
incidental to other changes made by the exercise of the decanting power is
not an increase in the fiduciary’s compensation for purposes of subsections
(a) and (b) of this section.

28-78-117. Relief from liability and indemnification.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a second-trust
instrument shall not relieve an authorized fiduciary from liability for
breach of trust to a greater extent than the first-trust instrument.
(b) A second-trust instrument may provide for indemnification of an
authorized fiduciary of the first trust or another person acting in a
fiduciary capacity under the first trust for any liability or claim that
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
would have been payable from the first trust if the decanting power had not
been exercised.
(c) A second-trust instrument shall not reduce fiduciary liability in
the aggregate.
(d) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, a second-trust
instrument may divide and reallocate fiduciary powers among fiduciaries,
including one or more trustees, distribution advisors, investment advisors,
trust protectors, or other persons, and relieve a fiduciary from liability
for an act or failure to act of another fiduciary as permitted by law of this
state other than this chapter.

28-78-118. Removal or replacement of authorized fiduciary.
An authorized fiduciary shall not exercise the decanting power to
modify a provision in a first-trust instrument granting another person power
to remove or replace the fiduciary unless the:
(1) Person holding the power consents to the modification in a
signed record and the modification applies only to the person;
(2) Person holding the power and the qualified beneficiaries of
the second trust consent to the modification in a signed record and the
modification grants a substantially similar power to another person; or
(3) Court approves the modification and the modification grants
a substantially similar power to another person.

28-78-119. Tax-related limitations.
(a) In this section:
(1) “Grantor trust” means a trust as to which a settlor of a
first trust is considered the owner under 26 U.S.C. Sections 671 through 677,
as it existed on January 1, 2025, or 26 U.S.C. Section 679, as it existed on
January 1, 2025;
(2) “Internal Revenue Code” means the United States Internal
Revenue Code of 1986, as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(3) “Nongrantor trust” means a trust that is not a grantor
trust; and
(4) “Qualified benefits property” means property subject to the
minimum distribution requirements of 26 U.S.C. Section 401(a)(9), as it
existed on January 1, 2025, and any applicable regulations, or to any similar
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
requirements that refer to 26 U.S.C. Section 401(a)(9) or the regulations.
(b) An exercise of the decanting power is subject to the following
limitations:
(1) If a first trust contains property that qualified, or would
have qualified but for provisions of this chapter other than this section,
for a marital deduction for purposes of the gift or estate tax under the
Internal Revenue Code or a state gift, estate, or inheritance tax, the
second-trust instrument shall not include or omit any term that, if included
in or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust to which the property
was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from qualifying for the
deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the deduction, under the same
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state law under which the transfer
qualified;
(2) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or
would have qualified but for provisions of this chapter other than this
section, for a charitable deduction for purposes of the income, gift, or
estate tax under the Internal Revenue Code or a state income, gift, estate,
or inheritance tax, the second-trust instrument shall not include or omit any
term that, if included in or omitted from the trust instrument for the trust
to which the property was transferred, would have prevented the transfer from
qualifying for the deduction, or would have reduced the amount of the
deduction, under the same provisions of the Internal Revenue Code or state
law under which the transfer qualified;
(3)(A) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or
would have qualified but for provisions of this chapter other than this
section, for the exclusion from the gift tax described in 26 U.S.C. Section
2503(b), as it existed on January 1, 20205, the second-trust instrument shall
not include or omit a term that, if included in or omitted from the trust
instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have
prevented the transfer from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. Section 2503(b), as
amended.
(B) If the first trust contains property that qualified,
or would have qualified but for provisions of this chapter other than this
section, for the exclusion from the gift tax described in 26 U.S.C. Section
2503(b), as it existed on January 1, 2025, by application of 26 U.S.C.
Section 2503(c),as it existed on January 1, 2025, the second-trust instrument
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
shall not include or omit a term that, if included or omitted from the trust
instrument for the trust to which the property was transferred, would have
prevented the transfer from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. Section 2503(c), as it
existed on January 1, 2025;
(4)(A) If the property of the first trust includes shares of
stock in an S corporation, as defined in 26 U.S.C. Section 1361, as it
existed on January 1, 2025, and the first trust is, or but for provisions of
this chapter other than this section would be, a permitted shareholder under
any provision of 26 U.S.C. Section 1361, as it existed on January 1, 2025, an
authorized fiduciary may exercise the power with respect to part or all of
the S-corporation stock only if any second trust receiving the stock is a
permitted shareholder under 26 U.S.C. Section 1361(c)(2), as it existed on
January 1, 2025.
(B) If the property of the first trust includes shares of
stock in an S corporation and the first trust is, or but for provisions of
this chapter other than this section would be, a qualified subchapter-S trust
within the meaning of 26 U.S.C. Section 1361(d), as it existed on January 1,
2025, the second-trust instrument shall not include or omit a term that
prevents the second trust from qualifying as a qualified subchapter-S trust;
(5) If the first trust contains property that qualified, or would
have qualified but for provisions of this chapter other than this section,
for a zero inclusion ratio for purposes of the generation-skipping transfer
tax under 26 U.S.C. Section 2642(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025, the
second-trust instrument shall not include or omit a term that, if included in
or omitted from the first-trust instrument, would have prevented the transfer
to the first trust from qualifying for a zero inclusion ratio under 26 U.S.C.
Section 2642(c), as it existed on January 1, 2025;
(6)(A) If the first trust is directly or indirectly the
beneficiary of qualified benefits property, the second-trust instrument shall
not include or omit any term that, if included in or omitted from the first-
trust instrument, would have increased the minimum distributions required
with respect to the qualified benefits property under 26 U.S.C. Section
401(a)(9), as it existed on January 1, 2025, and any applicable regulations,
or any similar requirements that refer to 26 U.S.C. Section 401(a)(9), as it
existed on January 1, 2025, or the regulations.
(B) If an attempted exercise of the decanting power
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
violates the preceding sentence, the trustee is deemed to have held the
qualified benefits property and any reinvested distributions of the property
as a separate share from the date of the exercise of the power and § 23-78-
122 applies to the separate share;
(7) If the first trust qualifies as a grantor trust because of
the application of 26 U.S.C. Section 672(f)(2)(A), as it existed on January
1, 2025, the second trust shall not include or omit a term that, if included
in or omitted from the first-trust instrument, would have prevented the first
trust from qualifying under 26 U.S.C. Section 672(f)(2)(A), as it existed on
January 1, 2025;
(8)(A) In subdivision(b)(8) of this section, “tax benefit” means
a federal or state tax deduction, exemption, exclusion, or other benefit not
otherwise listed in this section, except for a benefit arising from being a
grantor trust.
(B) Subject to subdivision (b)(9) of this section, a
second-trust instrument shall not include or omit a term that, if included in
or omitted from the first-trust instrument, would have prevented
qualification for a tax benefit if the:
(i) First-trust instrument expressly indicates an
intent to qualify for the benefit or the first-trust instrument clearly is
designed to enable the first trust to qualify for the benefit; and
(ii) Transfer of property held by the first trust or
the first trust qualified, or but for provisions of this other than this
chapter, would have qualified for the tax benefit;
(9) Subject to subdivision (b)(4) of this section except as
otherwise provided in:
(A) Subdivision (b)(7) of this section, the second trust
may be a nongrantor trust, even if the first trust is a grantor trust; and
(B) Subdivision (b)(10) of this section, the second trust
may be a grantor trust, even if the first trust is a nongrantor trust; and
(10) An authorized fiduciary shall not exercise the decanting
power if a settlor objects in a signed record delivered to the fiduciary
within the notice period and the first trust:
(A) And a second trust are both grantor trusts, in whole
or in part, the first trust grants the settlor or another person the power to
cause the first trust to cease to be a grantor trust, and the second trust
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
does not grant an equivalent power to the settlor or other person; or
(B) Is a nongrantor trust and a second trust is a grantor
trust, in whole or in part, with respect to the settlor, unless the:
(i) Settlor has the power at all times to cause the
second trust to cease to be a grantor trust; or
(ii) First-trust instrument contains a provision
granting the settlor or another person a power that would cause the first
trust to cease to be a grantor trust and the second-trust instrument contains
the same provision.

28-78-120. Duration of second trust.
(a) Subject to subsection (b) of this section, a second trust may have
a duration that is the same as or different from the duration of the first
trust.
(b) To the extent that property of a second trust is attributable to
property of the first trust, the property of the second trust is subject to
any rules governing maximum perpetuity, accumulation, or suspension of the
power of alienation which apply to property of the first trust.

28-78-121. Need to distribute not required.
An authorized fiduciary may exercise the decanting power whether or not
under the first trust’s discretionary distribution standard the fiduciary
would have made or could have been compelled to make a discretionary
distribution of principal at the time of the exercise.

28-78-122. Saving provision.
(a) If exercise of the decanting power would be effective under this
chapter except that the second-trust instrument in part does not comply with
this chapter, the exercise of the power is effective and the following rules
apply with respect to the principal of the second trust attributable to the
exercise of the power:
(1) A provision in the second-trust instrument which is not
permitted under this chapter is void to the extent necessary to comply with
this chapter; and
(2) A provision required by this chapter to be in the second-
trust instrument which is not contained in the instrument is deemed to be
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
included in the instrument to the extent necessary to comply with this
chapter.
(b) If a trustee or other fiduciary of a second trust determines that
subsection (a) of this section applies to a prior exercise of the decanting
power, the fiduciary shall take corrective action consistent with the
fiduciary’s duties.

28-78-123. Trust for care of animal.
(a) In this section:
(1) “Animal trust” means a trust or an interest in a trust
created to provide for the care of one or more animals; and
(2) “Protector” means a person appointed in an animal trust to
enforce the trust on behalf of the animal or, if no such person is appointed
in the trust, a person appointed by the court for that purpose.
(b) The decanting power may be exercised over an animal trust that has
a protector to the extent the trust could be decanted under this chapter if
each animal that benefits from the trust were an individual, if the protector
consents in a signed record to the exercise of the power.
(c) A protector for an animal has the rights under this chapter of a
qualified beneficiary.
(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if a first
trust is an animal trust, in an exercise of the decanting power, the second
trust shall provide that trust property may be applied only to its intended
purpose for the period the first trust benefitted the animal.

28-78-124. Terms of second trust.
A reference in the Arkansas Trust Code, § 28-73-101 et seq., to a trust
instrument or terms of the trust includes a second-trust instrument and the
terms of the second trust.

28-78-125. Settlor.
(a) For purposes of law of this state other than this chapter and
subject to subsection (b) of this section, a settlor of a first trust is
deemed to be the settlor of the second trust with respect to the portion of
the principal of the first trust subject to the exercise of the decanting
power.
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
(b) In determining settlor intent with respect to a second trust, the
intent of a settlor of the first trust, a settlor of the second trust, and
the authorized fiduciary may be considered.

28-78-126. Later-discovered property.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, if
exercise of the decanting power was intended to distribute all the principal
of the first trust to one or more second trusts, later-discovered property
belonging to the first trust and property paid to or acquired by the first
trust after the exercise of the power is part of the trust estate of the
second trust or trusts.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, if
exercise of the decanting power was intended to distribute less than all the
principal of the first trust to one or more second trusts, later-discovered
property belonging to the first trust or property paid to or acquired by the
first trust after exercise of the power remains part of the trust estate of
the first trust.
(c) An authorized fiduciary may provide in an exercise of the
decanting power or by the terms of a second trust for disposition of later-
discovered property belonging to the first trust or property paid to or
acquired by the first trust after exercise of the power.

28-78-127. Obligations.
A debt, liability, or other obligation enforceable against property of
a first trust is enforceable to the same extent against the property when
held by the second trust after exercise of the decanting power.

28-78-128. Uniformity of application and construction.
In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration shall be
given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its
subject matter among states that enact it.

28-78-129. Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National
Commerce Act.
This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the Electronic Signatures
in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001 et seq., but does
03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009

HB1749
not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section
7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in
Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

28-78-130. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or
circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions
or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
severable.

28-78-131. [Reserved.]

28-78-132. Effective date.
This chapter takes effect on and after January 1, 2026.





















03/11/2025 5:25:18 PM MAG009